Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2328.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1621(d) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a clause and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1621. Definitions.--As used in this article, the following words have the following meanings:* * *(d) The word "expenditure" shall mean:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (5) Remuneration paid from the candidate's authorized political committee under section 1634.2.* * *(i.1) The word "remuneration" shall mean direct payments made to a candidate unless the payments are otherwise permitted by law, such as candidate expense reimbursements and candidate loan repayments.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1634.2. Candidate Remuneration.--(a) A candidate for an office specified under this section may make an expenditure from the candidate's authorized political committee to pay remuneration to the candidate, to which the following shall apply:(1) A candidate running for any of the following offices in the Commonwealth may receive remuneration under this section:(i) Governor.(ii) Lieutenant Governor.(iii) Attorney General.(iv) Auditor General.(v) State Treasurer.(vi) Senator in the General Assembly.(vii) Representative in the General Assembly.(viii) Justice of the Supreme Court.(ix) Judge of the Superior Court.(x) Judge of the Commonwealth Court.(2) The candidate may only receive remuneration if the candidate has filed a nomination:(i) petition;(ii) paper; or20260HB2328PN3103 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) certificate for the office.(3) The candidate's total remuneration from the authorized political committee may not exceed fifty (50) per cent of the base salary of a member of the House of Representatives of the Commonwealth in the year the candidate is running for office.(4) (i) Except as provided under subclause (iii), the candidate may only receive remuneration on a daily basis of an amount equal to the maximum total remuneration specified in clause (3) and divided by the number of days between the day after nomination petitions are due and 20 days after the day of the November election.(ii) Prior to the first day on which nomination petitions can be circulated or filed, the Department of State shall each year post on its publicly accessible Internet website the maximum:(A) annual remuneration for a candidate under clause (3); and(B) daily rate under subclause (i) for that year's election cycle.(iii) For past days in the ongoing election cycle for which the candidate qualified for, but did not receive, remuneration under this section, the candidate may receive up to the maximum daily rate.(5) The candidate may:(i) not receive advanced remuneration for future days not yet served as a candidate; and(ii) only receive remuneration equal to the maximum daily rate under clause (4) multiplied by the number of days the candidate is authorized to receive remuneration under clause (2).20260HB2328PN3103 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) (i) The candidate may receive remuneration from the candidate's authorized political committee for up to twenty (20) days after the date in which the candidate wins a:(A) general election;(B) municipal election; or(C) special election.(ii) A candidate withdrawing the candidate's candidacy may not collect remuneration subject to this section if the candidate withdraws under:(A) section 633;(B) section 914; or(C) section 978.(iii) A candidate who has not formally withdrawn under subclause (ii) may collect remuneration for up to twenty (20) days after losing a:(A) general election;(B) primary election;(C) municipal election; or(D) special election.(b) A public official or public officer of the Commonwealth may not receive remuneration under this section.(c) The Department of State may develop regulations to carry out the provisions of this section. Regulations enacted by the Department of State shall not be agency regulations for the purposes of the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the "Regulatory Review Act."Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2328PN3103 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627